California, session 20252026, AB1674.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Food Affordability Act.SEC. 2. Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 49030) is added to Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code, to read: CHAPTER 15. Food Affordability Act Article 1. General Provisions49030. Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.49031. “Food desert” means a census tract or component layer that meets the definitions of both low-access area and low-income area.49032. “Large grocery store” means a retail store in this state of 15,000 or more square feet that is a retail seller of groceries, as described in Code 445110 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.49033. “Low-access area” means a census tract or component layer in which there are significant barriers to accessing a large grocery store, which may include, but not be limited to, a census tract or component layer with at least 33 percent of the population that lives more than one-half mile, for nonrural areas, or more than 10 miles, for rural areas, from a large grocery store.49034. “Low-income area” means a census tract or component layer with a poverty rate of 20 percent or higher, or a census tract or component layer with a median family income less than 80 percent of median family income for the state or metropolitan area.49035. “New housing development project” means new construction of apartments, townhomes, condominiums, or mobilehomes.49036. “Program” means the Food Desert Elimination Grant Program created pursuant to Section 49040.49037. “Site capacity” means infrastructure necessary to support a large grocery store, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(a) Loading bays or docks accommodating pallet jacks and delivery trucks.(b) Parking ratios of at least four spaces per 1,000 square feet of grocery retail space.(c) Structural provisions for refrigeration, high-volume utilities, and perishable good logistics.49038. “Small-scale grocery store” means a retail store in this state of under 15,000 square feet that is a retail seller of groceries, as described in Code 445110 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2022 edition.49039. The department may adopt guidelines to implement this chapter. Article 2. Food Desert Elimination Grant Program49040. (a) The Food Desert Elimination Grant Program is hereby created under the administration of the department for the purpose of expanding access to healthy foods in food deserts in the state, and areas at risk of becoming food deserts, by providing grants to developers and grocery store operators.(b) (1) The Food Desert Elimination Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury and moneys in the fund may be expended by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of the program.(2) The department may collect nonstate, federal, and private moneys for the purpose of the program, and those moneys shall be deposited into the California Equitable Food Access Account, which is hereby created within the Food Desert Elimination Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the account shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the department for the purpose of the program.49041. (a) The department may award a grant to a developer or grocery store operator seeking to locate a grocery store in a food desert, or to a grocery store located in a food desert, for one or more of the following purposes:(1) A market and site feasibility study.(2) Salaries and benefits to grocery store employees.(3) Rents or downpayments to acquire a facility located in a food desert.(4) Capital improvements, planning, renovations, land acquisition, demolition, and durable and nondurable equipment purchases.(5) Other costs determined eligible by the department, including costs specified in federal funding program requirements.(b) (1) The department may also award a grant to a grocery store operator of an existing large grocery store that provides essential food access to a low-access and low-income area for the purposes described in paragraph (2).(2) Grant funding pursuant to paragraph (1) may be used to support the retention, stabilization, or continued operation of the large grocery store in its existing location, including, but not limited to, lease assistance, rent support, facility improvements, equipment upgrades, or other transitional operational costs deemed eligible by the department.(3) In determining eligibility for a grant pursuant to paragraph (1), the department may consider whether the displacement of the existing large grocery store would increase barriers to food access for the surrounding community or contribute to the creation of a food desert.49042. The department may award a grant described in subdivision (a) of Section 49041 to a small-scale grocery store.49043. When awarding grants pursuant to this chapter, the department shall prioritize developers and grocery store operators seeking to locate a grocery store in a food desert, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 49041, as part of a new housing development project subject to the requirements of Section 65913.17 of the Government Code. 49044. The department may use up to 10 percent of total program funding for technical assistance.49045. A developer or grocery store operator that receives a grant pursuant to Section 49041 and opens a grocery store in a food desert shall return any unused grant moneys to the department if the grocery store closes within two years of the date of opening.49046. On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall report the number of grants awarded under the program and the location of grant recipients to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. Article 3. Repeal Date49050. This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 65913.17 is added to the Government Code, to read:65913.17. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: (1) “Food desert” has the same meaning as defined in Section 49031 of the Food and Agricultural Code.(2) “Large grocery store” has the same meaning as defined in Section 49032 of the Food and Agricultural Code. (3) “Low-access area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 49033 of the Food and Agricultural Code.(4) “Low-income area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 49034 of the Food and Agricultural Code. (5) “New housing development project” has the same meaning as defined in Section 49035 of the Food and Agricultural Code.(6) “Site capacity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 49037 of the Food and Agricultural Code. (b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for a new housing development project proposed for approval by a local government in a food desert, or an area at risk of becoming a food desert, the local government shall require the applicant to demonstrate that the new housing development project does not reduce site capacity for a large grocery store, or, if site capacity is reduced, to provide equivalent mitigation pursuant to paragraph (2).(2) Mitigation shall include, at a minimum, dedication of equivalent space and infrastructure for future grocery use, or funding contributions to the Food Desert Elimination Fund, pursuant to Section 49040 of the Food and Agricultural Code, that are sufficient for a replacement store within one-half mile, as determined by the Department of Food and Agriculture.(c) Local governments shall report annually to the Department of Food and Agriculture on new housing development projects subject to this section, including capacity assessments and mitigation.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that ensuring access to food for people living in food deserts, low-income and low-access areas, is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 3 of this act adding Section 65913.17 to the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 5. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.